Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Physical Examinations and Screening Examinations.

Administrative Code. —

For physical examination of school children and school employees, see 7 AAC 27, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, §§ 311-317.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, §§ 722-725.

Sec. 14.30.060.
Purpose of AS 14.30.070 — 14.30.110. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 14.30.065.
Supervision.

The program of physical examination and immunizations prescribed by AS

14.30.065

—

14.30.127

shall be under the general supervision and in accordance with regulations of the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(§ 42 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 131 SLA 1967; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For physical examination of school children, see 7 AAC 27, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

Power of court or other public agency to order vaccination over parental religious objection. 94 ALR5th 613.

Sec. 14.30.070.
Physical examination required.

[Repealed, §§ 25, 29 ch 2 SSSLA 2015.]

The Department of Health and Social Services may require the district to conduct physical examinations that it considers necessary, and may reimburse the district for the examinations on the basis and to the extent the commissioner of health and social services prescribes by regulation.

Examinations shall be made by a competent physician or, within the scope of chiropractic practice, by a chiropractor, except that if the services of a physician or chiropractor cannot be obtained or if authorized by the commissioner of health and social services examinations may be made by a nurse.

History.

(§ 37-7-11 ACLA 1949; am § 10 ch 118 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1953; am § 43 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 11 ch 60 SLA 1988; am § 32 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 13 ch 2 SSSLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For pre-elementary (early childhood) school, see 4 AAC 60.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective October 7, 2015, in (b) twice deleted “additional” preceding “physical examinations” and “examinations”.

The 2015 amendment, effective June 30, 2016, repealed (a).

Sec. 14.30.075.
Physical examinations for teachers.

A school district may require physical examinations of teachers as a condition of employment. A school district is not required to pay the cost of physical examinations for teachers. This section does not affect the coverage of any health insurance benefits that a school district provides to teachers.

In this section, “school district” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

.

History.

(§ 17 ch 54 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 17, ch. 54, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effective October 26, 2016.

Secs. 14.30.080 — 14.30.110.
Exclusion from attendance; vaccinations; supervision and expenditures for physical examinations; exemptions from examinations or vaccinations. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]

Sec. 14.30.120.
Certificate of physical examination. [Repealed, § 25 ch 2 SLA 2015.]

Sec. 14.30.125.
Immunization.

If in the judgment of the commissioner of health and social services it is necessary for the welfare of the children or the general public in an area, the governing body of the school district shall require the children attending school in that area to be immunized against the diseases the commissioner of health and social services may specify.

History.

(§ 45 ch 98 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 131 SLA 1967; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971)

Collateral references. —

Power of court or other public agency to order vaccination over parental religious objection. 94 ALR5th 613.

Sec. 14.30.127.
Vision and hearing screening examinations.

A vision and hearing screening examination shall be given to each child attending school in the state. The examination shall be made when the child enters school or as soon thereafter as is practicable, and at regular intervals specified by regulation by the governing body of the district.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall

set standards for the performance of vision and hearing screening;

train and certify public health nurses and school district employees to conduct hearing and vision screening tests;

assist with referral and follow-up of children needing professional examination or treatment; and

assist with maintenance and repair of screening equipment.

History.

(§ 6 ch 138 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

14.30.075

. Renumbered in 1982.

Secs. 14.30.130 — 14.30.140.
Readmission of child excluded on account of communicable disease; examination and treatment by municipal health officers. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]